California, session 20252026, AB294.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8587.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:8587.1. (a) The Office of Emergency Services may prioritize funding and technical assistance under any of the programs listed in subdivision (b), including, but not limited to, for infrastructure and housing recovery projects, in communities that meet both of the following requirements:(1) Suffered a loss in population and businesses due to a major federal disaster, state of emergency, or local emergency.(2) Have unmet recovery needs as a result of a major federal disaster, state of emergency, or local emergency.(b) (1) The federal Hazard Mitigation Grant Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5170c).(2) The federal Building Resilient Infrastructure and Communities program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5133).(3) The California Disaster Assistance Act (Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 8680)).